Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Chapter 23. Family Courts
[Repealed]

§§ 43-23-1 through 43-23-55.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1999, ch. 432, § 2, eff from and after May 28, 1999 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965).

§43-23-1. [Codes, 1942, § 7187-01; Laws, 1964, ch. 328, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1964)]

§43-23-3. [Codes, 1942, § 7187-02; Laws, 1964, ch. 328, § 2; Laws 1977, ch. 474, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1977]

§43-23-5. [Codes, 1942, § 7187-03; Laws, 1964, ch. 328, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1964)]

§43-23-7. [Codes, 1942, § 7187-04; Laws, 1964, ch. 328, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1964)]

§43-23-9. [Codes, 1942, § 7187-05; Laws, 1964, ch. 328, § 5; Laws, 1977, ch. 474, § 5; Laws, 1978, ch. 471, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 4, 1978)]

§43-23-11. [Codes, 1942, § 7187-06; Laws, 1964, ch. 328, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1964)]

§43-23-13. [Codes, 1942, § 7187-07; Laws, 1964, ch. 328, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1964)]

§43-23-15. [Codes, 1942, § 7187-08; Laws, 1964, ch. 328, § 8; Laws, 1977, ch. 474, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1977]

§43-23-17. [Codes, 1942, § 7187-09; Laws, 1964, ch. 328, § 9; Laws, 1966, ch. 606, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 11, 1966)]

§43-23-19. [Codes, 1942, § 7187-10; Laws, 1964, ch. 328, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1964)]

§43-23-21. [Codes, 1942, § 7187-11; Laws, 1964, ch. 328, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1964)]

§43-23-23. [Codes, 1942, § 7187-12; Laws, 1964, ch. 328, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1964)]

§43-23-25. [Codes, 1942, § 7187-13; Laws, 1964, ch. 328, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1964)]

§43-23-27. [Codes, 1942, § 7187-14; Laws, 1964, ch. 328, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1964)]

§43-23-29. [Codes, 1942, § 7187-15; Laws, 1964, ch. 328, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1964)]

§43-23-31. [Codes, 1942, § 7187-16; Laws, 1964, ch. 328, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1964)]

§43-23-33. [Codes, 1942, § 7187-17; Laws, 1964, ch. 328, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1964)]

§43-23-35. [Codes, 1942, § 7187-18; Laws, 1964, ch. 328, § 18, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1964)]

§43-23-37. [Codes, 1942, § 7187-19; Laws, 1964, ch. 328, § 19; Laws 1986, ch. 356, eff from and after July 1, 1986]

§43-23-39. [Codes, 1942, § 7187-20; Laws, 1964, ch. 328, § 20; Laws 1966, ch. 345, § 1; Laws 1968, ch. 311, § 2; Laws, 1970, ch. 402, § 4; Laws, 1971, ch. 495, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 486, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1973)]

§43-23-41. [Codes, 1942, § 7187-21; Laws, 1964, ch. 328, § 21; Laws 1977, ch. 474, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1977]

§43-23-43. [Codes, 1942, § 7187-22; Laws, 1964, ch. 328, § 22; Laws, 1985, ch. 536, § 10; Laws, 1986, ch. 400, § 29, eff from and after Oct 1, 1986]

§43-23-45. [Codes, 1942, § 7187-23; Laws, 1964, ch. 328, § 23, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1964)]

§43-23-47. [Codes, 1942, § 7187-24; Laws, 1964, ch. 328, § 24; Laws, 1968, ch. 361, § 69; Laws, 1979, ch. 397, eff from and after May 1, 1979]

§43-23-49. [Codes, 1942, § 7187-25; Laws, 1964, ch. 328, § 25, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1964)]

§43-23-51. [Codes, 1942, § 7187-26; Laws, 1964, ch. 328, § 26, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1964)]

§43-23-53. [Codes, 1942, § 7187-27; Laws, 1964, ch. 328, § 27, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1964)]

§43-23-55. [Codes, 1942, § 7187-28; Laws, 1964, ch. 328, § 28, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1964)]